Hawaii statutes.
§342C-1 Definitions. As used in this
chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Chlorofluorocarbon" or "CFC"
means any member of the family of substances containing carbon, fluorine, and
chlorine, including, without limitation, those compounds known as CFC-11,
CFC-12, CFC-13, CFC-14, CFC-113, CFC-114, CFC-115, CFC-116, CFC-500, CFC-502,
and CFC-503, and any combination or mixture containing any of these
chlorofluorocarbon compounds.

"Department" means the department of
health.

"Director" means the director of
health.

"Halon" means any fully halogenated
carbon compound containing bromine, chlorine, or fluorine, including, without
limitation, those compounds known as Halon-1301, Halon-1211, and Halon-2402.

"Mobile air conditioner" means an air
conditioner designed for installation in a motor vehicle.

"Ozone-depleting compound" means any
chlorofluorocarbon or halon, including those compounds known as methyl
chloroform and carbon tetrachloride, or any other compound designated by the
United States Environmental Protection Agency as being an ozone-depleting
compound pursuant to Title 40, Part 82, Code of Federal Regulations, or any
other compound designated by the department as being an ozone-depleting
compound.

"Person" includes any individual, firm,
association, partnership, or corporation, whether domestic or foreign, whether
acting as a principal, agent, employee, or otherwise, and includes any
governmental entity or charitable organization.

"Portable" means capable of being
carried in hand by one individual. [L 1990, c 316, pt of §2; am L 1992, c 264,
§2]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next